Nevada, session 83, AB163.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 641A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Counseling Compact is hereby ratified and entered into
with all other jurisdictions legally joining the Compact, in
substantially the form set forth in this section:
COUNSELING COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice
of Licensed Professional Counselors with the goal of improving
public access to Professional Counseling services. The practice of
Professional Counseling occurs in the State where the client is
located at the time of the counseling services. The Compact
preserves the regulatory authority of States to protect public health
and safety through the current system of State licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to Professional Counseling services
by providing for the mutual recognition of other Member State
licenses;
B. Enhance the States’ ability to protect the public’s health
and safety;
C. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in
regulating multistate practice for Licensed Professional
Counselors;
D. Support spouses of relocating Active Duty Military
personnel;
E. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and
disciplinary information among Member States;
F. Allow for the use of Telehealth technology to facilitate
increased access to Professional Counseling services;
G. Support the uniformity of Professional Counseling
licensure requirements throughout the States to promote public
safety and public health benefits;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
H. Invest all Member States with the authority to hold a
Licensed Professional Counselor accountable for meeting all State
practice laws in the State in which the client is located at the time
care is rendered through the mutual recognition of Member State
licenses;
I. Eliminate the necessity for licenses in multiple States; and
J. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by Licensed
Professional Counselors who meet uniform licensure
requirements.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active Duty Military” means full-time duty status in the
active uniformed service of the United States, including members
of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty orders pursuant
to 10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and 1211.
B. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable or criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is
imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a Licensed
Professional Counselor, including actions against an individual’s
license or Privilege to Practice such as revocation, suspension,
probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s
practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure affecting a
Licensed Professional Counselor’s authorization to practice,
including issuance of a cease and desist action.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a
Professional Counseling Licensing Board to address Impaired
Practitioners.
D. “Continuing Competence/Education” means a
requirement, as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence
of participation in, and/or completion of, educational and
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
E. “Counseling Compact Commission” or “Commission”
means the national administrative body whose membership
consists of all States that have enacted the Compact.
F. “Current Significant Investigative Information” means:
1. Investigative Information that a Licensing Board, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity
for the Licensed Professional Counselor to respond, if required by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
State law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved
true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or
2. Investigative Information that indicates that the Licensed
Professional Counselor represents an immediate threat to public
health and safety regardless of whether the Licensed Professional
Counselor has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
G. “Data System” means a repository of information about
Licensees, including, but not limited to, continuing education,
examination, licensure, investigative, Privilege to Practice and
Adverse Action information.
H. “Encumbered License” means a license in which an
Adverse Action restricts the practice of licensed Professional
Counseling by the Licensee and said Adverse Action has been
reported to the National Practitioners Data Bank (NPDB).
I. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or
any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of Licensed
Professional Counseling by a Licensing Board.
J. “Executive Committee” means a group of directors elected
or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to
them by, the Commission.
K. “Home State” means the Member State that is the
Licensee’s primary State of residence.
L. “Impaired Practitioner” means an individual who has a
condition(s) that may impair their ability to practice as a Licensed
Professional Counselor without some type of intervention and may
include, but are not limited to, alcohol and drug dependence,
mental health impairment, and neurological or physical
impairments.
M. “Investigative Information” means information, records,
and documents received or generated by a Professional
Counseling Licensing Board pursuant to an investigation.
N. “Jurisprudence Requirement” if required by a Member
State, means the assessment of an individual’s knowledge of the
laws and Rules governing the practice of Professional Counseling
in a State.
O. “Licensed Professional Counselor” means a counselor
licensed by a Member State, regardless of the title used by that
State, to independently assess, diagnose, and treat behavioral
health conditions.
P. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds an
authorization from the State to practice as a Licensed Professional
Counselor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Q. “Licensing Board” means the agency of a State, or
equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of
Licensed Professional Counselors.
R. “Member State” means a State that has enacted the
Compact.
S. “Privilege to Practice” means a legal authorization, which
is equivalent to a license, permitting the practice of Professional
Counseling in a Remote State.
T. “Professional Counseling” means the assessment,
diagnosis, and treatment of behavioral health conditions by a
Licensed Professional Counselor.
U. “Remote State” means a Member State other than the
Home State, where a Licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise
the Privilege to Practice.
V. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by the
Commission that has the force of law.
W. “Single State License” means a Licensed Professional
Counselor license issued by a Member State that authorizes
practice only within the issuing State and does not include a
Privilege to Practice in any other Member State.
X. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the practice
of Professional Counseling.
Y. “Telehealth” means the application of telecommunication
technology to deliver Professional Counseling services remotely to
assess, diagnose, and treat behavioral health conditions.
Z. “Unencumbered License” means a license that authorizes
a Licensed Professional Counselor to engage in the full and
unrestricted practice of Professional Counseling.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To Participate in the Compact, a State must currently:
1. License and regulate Licensed Professional Counselors;
2. Require Licensees to pass a nationally recognized exam
approved by the Commission;
3. Require Licensees to have a 60 semester-hour (or 90
quarter-hour) master’s degree in counseling or 60 semester-hours
(or 90 quarter-hours) of graduate course work including the
following topic areas:
a. Professional Counseling Orientation and Ethical
Practice;
b. Social and Cultural Diversity;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
c. Human Growth and Development;
d. Career Development;
e. Counseling and Helping Relationships;
f. Group Counseling and Group Work;
g. Diagnosis and Treatment; Assessment and Testing;
h. Research and Program Evaluation; and
i. Other areas as determined by the Commission.
4. Require Licensees to complete a supervised postgraduate
professional experience as defined by the Commission; and
5. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints about Licensees.
B. A Member State shall:
1. Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System,
including using the Commission’s unique identifier as defined in
Rules;
2. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability
of Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the
criminal history records of applicants for an initial Privilege to
Practice. These procedures shall include the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants
for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
agency responsible for retaining that State’s criminal records;
a. A member state must fully implement a criminal
background check requirement, within a time frame established by
rule, by receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search and shall use the results in making
licensure decisions.
b. Communication between a Member State, the
Commission and among Member States regarding the verification
of eligibility for licensure through the Compact shall not include
any information received from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check
performed by a Member State under Public Law 92-544.
4. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
5. Require an applicant to obtain or retain a license in the
Home State and meet the Home State’s qualifications for
licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable
State laws;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
6. Grant the Privilege to Practice to a Licensee holding a
valid Unencumbered License in another Member State in
accordance with the terms of the Compact and Rules; and
7. Provide for the attendance of the State’s commissioner to
the Counseling Compact Commission meetings.
C. Member States may charge a fee for granting the Privilege
to Practice.
D. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall continue
to be able to apply for a Member State’s Single State License as
provided under the laws of each Member State. However, the
Single State License granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting a Privilege to Practice Professional
Counseling in any other Member State.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State
License.
F. A license issued to a Licensed Professional Counselor by a
Home State to a resident in that State shall be recognized by each
Member State as authorizing a Licensed Professional Counselor
to practice Professional Counseling, under a Privilege to Practice,
in each Member State.
SECTION 4. PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE
A. To exercise the Privilege to Practice under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Hold a license in the Home State;
2. Have a valid United States Social Security Number or
National Practitioner Identifier;
3. Be eligible for a Privilege to Practice in any Member
State in accordance with Section 4(D), (G) and (H);
4. Have not had any Encumbrance or restriction against
any license or Privilege to Practice within the previous two (2)
years;
5. Notify the Commission that the Licensee is seeking the
Privilege to Practice within a Remote State(s);
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the
Privilege to Practice;
7. Meet any Continuing Competence/Education
requirements established by the Home State;
8. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the
Remote State(s) in which the Licensee is seeking a Privilege to
Practice; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
9. Report to the Commission any Adverse Action,
Encumbrance, or restriction on license taken by any non-Member
State within 30 days from the date the action is taken.
B. The Privilege to Practice is valid until the expiration date
of the Home State license. The Licensee must comply with the
requirements of Section 4(A) to maintain the Privilege to Practice
in the Remote State.
C. A Licensee providing Professional Counseling in a
Remote State under the Privilege to Practice shall adhere to the
laws and regulations of the Remote State.
D. A Licensee providing Professional Counseling services in
a Remote State is subject to that State’s regulatory authority. A
Remote State may, in accordance with due process and that State’s
laws, remove a Licensee’s Privilege to Practice in the Remote State
for a specific period of time, impose fines, and/or take any other
necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens.
The Licensee may be ineligible for a Privilege to Practice in any
Member State until the specific time for removal has passed and
all fines are paid.
E. If a Home State license is encumbered, the Licensee shall
lose the Privilege to Practice in any Remote State until the
following occur:
1. The Home State license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Have not had any Encumbrance or restriction against
any license or Privilege to Practice within the previous two (2)
years.
F. Once an Encumbered License in the Home State is
restored to good standing, the Licensee must meet the
requirements of Section 4(A) to obtain a Privilege to Practice in
any Remote State.
G. If a Licensee’s Privilege to Practice in any Remote State is
removed, the individual may lose the Privilege to Practice in all
other Remote States until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the Privilege to
Practice was removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid; and
3. Have not had any Encumbrance or restriction against
any license or Privilege to Practice within the previous two (2)
years.
H. Once the requirements of Section 4(G) have been met, the
Licensee must meet the requirements in Section 4(A) to obtain a
Privilege to Practice in a Remote State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
SECTION 5. OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE
BASED ON A PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE
A. A Licensed Professional Counselor may hold a Home
State license, which allows for a Privilege to Practice in other
Member States, in only one Member State at a time.
B. If a Licensed Professional Counselor changes primary
State of residence by moving between two Member States:
1. The Licensed Professional Counselor shall file an
application for obtaining a new Home State license based on a
Privilege to Practice, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current
and new Home State in accordance with applicable Rules adopted
by the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new Home
State license by virtue of a Privilege to Practice, the new Home
State shall verify that the Licensed Professional Counselor meets
the pertinent criteria outlined in Section 4 via the Data System,
without need for primary source verification except for:
a. A Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based
criminal background check if not previously performed or updated
pursuant to applicable rules adopted by the Commission in
accordance with Public Law 92-544;
b. Other criminal background check as required by the
new Home State; and
c. Completion of any requisite Jurisprudence
Requirements of the new Home State.
3. The former Home State shall convert the former Home
State license into a Privilege to Practice once the new Home State
has activated the new Home State license in accordance with
applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if
the Licensed Professional Counselor cannot meet the criteria in
Section 4, the new Home State may apply its requirements for
issuing a new Single State License.
5. The Licensed Professional Counselor shall pay all
applicable fees to the new Home State in order to be issued a new
Home State license.
C. If a Licensed Professional Counselor changes Primary
State of Residence by moving from a Member State to a non-
Member State, or from a non-Member State to a Member State,
the State criteria shall apply for issuance of a Single State License
in the new State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s
ability to hold a Single State License in multiple States, however
for the purposes of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only one
Home State license.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State
License.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY
PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES
Active Duty Military personnel, or their spouse, shall designate
a Home State where the individual has a current license in good
standing. The individual may retain the Home State designation
during the period the service member is on active duty.
Subsequent to designating a Home State, the individual shall only
change their Home State through application for licensure in the
new State, or through the process outlined in Section 5.
SECTION 7. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
TO PRACTICE TELEHEALTH
A. Member States shall recognize the right of a Licensed
Professional Counselor, licensed by a Home State in accordance
with Section 3 and under Rules promulgated by the Commission,
to practice Professional Counseling in any Member State via
Telehealth under a Privilege to Practice as provided in the
Compact and Rules promulgated by the Commission.
B. A Licensee providing Professional Counseling services in
a Remote State under the Privilege to Practice shall adhere to the
laws and regulations of the Remote State.
SECTION 8. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a
Remote State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing
State due process law, to:
1. Take Adverse Action against a Licensed Professional
Counselor’s Privilege to Practice within that Member State, and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations
that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as
the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing
Board in a Member State for the attendance and testimony of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member
State shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of
that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending
before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes
of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Only the Home State shall have the power to take
Adverse Action against a Licensed Professional Counselor’s
license issued by the Home State.
B. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State
shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received
from a Member State as it would if the conduct had occurred
within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply its
own State laws to determine appropriate action.
C. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations
of a Licensed Professional Counselor who changes primary State
of residence during the course of the investigations. The Home
State shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s)
and shall promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to
the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the
coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the
new Home State of any Adverse Actions.
D. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may
recover from the affected Licensed Professional Counselor the
costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
Adverse Action taken against that Licensed Professional
Counselor.
E. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the
factual findings of the Remote State, provided that the Member
State follows its own procedures for taking the Adverse Action.
F. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by
its respective Professional Counseling practice act or other
applicable State law, any Member State may participate with other
Member States in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against the
license of a Licensed Professional Counselor, the Licensed
Professional Counselor’s Privilege to Practice in all other Member
States shall be deactivated until all Encumbrances have been
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
removed from the State license. All Home State disciplinary orders
that impose Adverse Action against the license of a Licensed
Professional Counselor shall include a Statement that the
Licensed Professional Counselor’s Privilege to Practice is
deactivated in all Member States during the pendency of the order.
H. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly
notify the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of
the Data System shall promptly notify the Home State of any
Adverse Actions by Remote States.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s
decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be used
in lieu of Adverse Action.
SECTION 9. ESTABLISHMENT OF COUNSELING
COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a
joint public agency known as the Counseling Compact
Commission.
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact
States.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s Licensing Board.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the Licensing Board at the time
of appointment, who is a Licensed Professional Counselor or
public member; or
b. An administrator of the Licensing Board.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office
as provided by the law of the State from which the delegate is
appointed.
4. The Member State Licensing Board shall fill any
vacancy occurring on the Commission within 60 days.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote with
regard to the promulgation of Rules and creation of bylaws and
shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business
and affairs of the Commission.
6. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the
bylaws.
8. The Commission shall by Rule establish a term of office
for delegates and may by Rule establish term limits.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and
duties:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish bylaws;
3. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
4. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact and the bylaws;
5. Promulgate Rules which shall be binding to the extent
and in the manner provided for in the Compact;
6. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State
Licensing Board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not
be affected;
7. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
8. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
9. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
10. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times
the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or
conflict of interest;
11. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations
of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Commission shall
avoid any appearance of impropriety;
12. Sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
13. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
14. Borrow money;
15. Appoint committees, including standing committees
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
16. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
17. Establish and elect an Executive Committee; and
18. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact consistent
with the State regulation of Professional Counseling licensure and
practice.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to
eleven (11) members:
a. Seven (7) voting members who are elected by the
Commission from the current membership of the Commission;
and
b. Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from
four (4) recognized national professional counselor organizations.
c. The ex-officio members will be selected by their
respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
5. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties
and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees paid by
Compact Member States such as annual dues, and any
Commission Compact fee charged to Licensees for the Privilege to
Practice;
b. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Other duties as provided in Rules or bylaws.
E. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public
notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required
under the Rulemaking provisions in Section 11.
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting if the Commission or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial
information that is privileged or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where
disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law
enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative
reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission
or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Member State statute.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant
to this provision, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each
relevant exempting provision.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority
vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
F. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State or impose fees on other
parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate
annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall
promulgate a Rule binding upon all Member States.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member States,
except by and with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and
disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for
any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee or representative of the Commission
in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of
the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
SECTION 10. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated database
and reporting system containing licensure, Adverse Action, and
Investigative Information on all licensed individuals in Member
States.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the
contrary, a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a license or Privilege to
Practice;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
Program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial;
6. Current Significant Investigative Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
C. Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any
Member State will only be available to other Member States.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all Member States
of any Adverse Action taken against a Licensee or an individual
applying for a license. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will be available to any other
Member State.
E. Member States contributing information to the Data
System may designate information that may not be shared with the
public without the express permission of the contributing State.
F. Any information submitted to the Data System that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the Member
State contributing the information shall be removed from the Data
System.
SECTION 11. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purpose of the
Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the
Commission exercises its Rulemaking authority in a manner that
is beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the powers
granted hereunder, then such an action by the Commission shall
be invalid and have no force or effect.
B. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules
adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding
as of the date specified in each Rule or amendment.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States
rejects a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
manner used to adopt the Compact within four (4) years of the
date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further
force and effect in any Member State.
D. Rules or amendments to the Rules shall be adopted at a
regular or special meeting of the Commission.
E. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or
Rules by the Commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance
of the meeting at which the Rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a Notice of Proposed
Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each Member State Professional
Counseling Licensing Board or other publicly accessible platform
or the publication in which each State would otherwise publish
proposed Rules.
F. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in
which the Rule will be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed Rule or amendment and the
reason for the proposed Rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit
notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the public
hearing and any written comments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission
shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and
arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
H. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public
hearing before it adopts a Rule or amendment if a hearing is
requested by:
1. At least twenty-five (25) persons;
2. A State or federal governmental subdivision or agency;
or
3. An association having at least twenty-five (25) members.
I. If a hearing is held on the proposed Rule or amendment,
the Commission shall publish the place, time, and date of the
scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to
the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall
notify the executive director of the Commission or other
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the
scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each
person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity
to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording
will be made available on request.
4. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
Section.
J. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of
business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not
held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral comments
received.
K. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing
by interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed Rule without a public hearing.
L. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed Rule and shall determine the
effective date of the Rule, if any, based on the Rulemaking record
and the full text of the Rule.
M. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule without
prior notice, opportunity for comment, or hearing, provided that
the usual Rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in
this Section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision,
an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in
order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an
administrative Rule that is established by federal law or Rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
N. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule or
amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing
and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the
revision may not take effect without the approval of the
Commission.
SECTION 12. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE
RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of State
government in each Member State shall enforce this Compact and
take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the
Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact
and the Rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as
statutory law.
2. All courts shall take judicial notice of the Compact and
the Rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a
Member State pertaining to the subject matter of this Compact
which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the
Commission.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any such proceeding and shall have standing to
intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide
service of process to the Commission shall render a judgment or
order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated
Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission
shall:
a. Provide written notice to the defaulting State and
other Member States of the nature of the default, the proposed
means of curing the default and/or any other action to be taken by
the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative
vote of a majority of the Member States, and all rights, privileges
and benefits conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve
the offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the
period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, and each of
the Member States.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
F. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the
Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission
and the defaulting State.
G. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
H. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among Member States and between member and non-Member
States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
I. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions and Rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a Member State in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded
all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies
of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or State law.
SECTION 13. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION
OF THE COUNSELING COMPACT
COMMISSION AND ASSOCIATED RULES,
WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth Member State.
The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be
limited to the powers granted to the Commission relating to
assembly and the promulgation of Rules. Thereafter, the
Commission shall meet and exercise Rulemaking powers
necessary to the implementation and administration of the
Compact.
B. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules shall be subject to the
Rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
the Compact becomes law in that State.
C. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing State’s Professional Counseling Licensing
Board to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action
reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any Professional Counseling licensure
agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member
State and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the
provisions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all
Member States.
SECTION 14. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate
the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this
Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any
Member State or of the United States or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall
not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held contrary to
the constitution of any Member State, the Compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full
force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable
matters.
SECTION 15. BINDING EFFECT OF
COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
A. A Licensee providing Professional Counseling services in
a Remote State under the Privilege to Practice shall adhere to the
laws and regulations, including scope of practice, of the Remote
State.
B. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law
of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
C. Any laws in a Member State in conflict with the Compact
are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
D. Any lawful actions of the Commission, including all Rules
and bylaws properly promulgated by the Commission, are binding
upon the Member States.
E. All permissible agreements between the Commission and
the Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
F. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any Member
State, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict
with the constitutional provision in question in that Member State.
Sec. 2. NRS 641A.191 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641A.191 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115, and section 1 of this act, any records or information
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
obtained during the course of an investigation by the Board and any
record of the investigation are confidential.
2. The complaint or other document filed by the Board to
initiate disciplinary action and all documents and information
considered by the Board when determining whether to impose
discipline are public records.
3. This section does not prohibit the Board from
communicating or cooperating with any other licensing board or
agency or any agency which is investigating a licensee, including a
law enforcement agency.
Sec. 3. The preliminary chapter of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise expressly provided in a particular statute
or required by the context, privilege to practice as a licensed
professional counselor in this State under the Counseling
Compact ratified and entered into in section 1 of this act shall be
deemed to be equivalent to a license to practice as a clinical
professional counselor issued by the Board of Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS.
Sec. 4. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 1 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)